Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1156.
do enact as follows:SB1156,14Section 1. 11.1112 of the statutes is amended to read:SB1156,2,5511.1112 Corporations, cooperatives, and tribes. No foreign or domestic 1corporation, no association organized under ch. 185 or 193, no labor organization, 2and no federally recognized American Indian Tribe may make a contribution to a 3committee, other than an independent expenditure committee or referendum 4committee, but may make a contribution to a segregated fund as provided under s. 511.1104 (6) in amounts not to exceed $12,000 in the aggregate in a calendar year.SB1156,2,66